src/fst/phonology.xfscript
!  This file is a script for the Xerox xfst interface.

clear stack
echo << THE DEFININTIONS >>

echo << defining Vow >>

define Vow [ a | e | i | o | y
           | A | E | I | O | Y
           ];

echo << defining Cns >>
define Cns [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n
           | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ];

define Syll [ (Cns) (Cns) Vow (Cns) (Cns) ] ; 

echo << defining Boundary >>
define Boundary %> ;





! Consonant alternations in certain pos
! -------------------------------------



! Vowel shifts
! ------------

echo << defining the rules >>

define LongInfDeletion y -> 0 || _ n y %^Inf %> Vow ; 

define InfDeletion   n y -> 0 || _ %^Inf ;



!define PalatalisedSuffixes ê -> e, ë -> o || Vow Boundary (x) _ ;

!define PalatalMarkDeletion ' -> 0 || _ Boundary e ;

!define HardMarkDeletion x -> 0 || Vow Boundary _ ;

!commented below line as it turned 'al' to 'av' ... why was it ever there?!
!define LtoV [ l -> v || _ [ .#. | %> Cns ] ] ;

define Syncope ö2 (->) 0, e2 (->) 0, o2 (->) 0 || _ Cns %> (x) Vow ;

define ParagogicCns j2 -> j, k2 -> k, m2 -> m, t2 -> t || _ %> Vow ;



echo << defining cleanup rules >>

define Cleanup ö2 -> ö, e2 -> e, o2 -> o ;

define BoundaryDeletion [ %> -> 0 ] ;

define Deletion [ k2 -> 0, m2 -> 0, t2 -> 0, %@ -> 0, %^Inf -> 0 ] ;
!                %^@ -> 0,  ;

echo << composing different parts >>

read regex [ 
LongInfDeletion
.o.
InfDeletion
.o.
!PalatalisedSuffixes
!.o.
!PalatalMarkDeletion
!.o.
!HardMarkDeletion
!.o.
!LtoV
!.o.
Syncope
.o.
ParagogicCns
.o.
Cleanup
.o.
BoundaryDeletion
.o.
Deletion 
] ;
